Illinois, session 104th, HB4422.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Sections 5-6-3.4 and 5-6-3.6 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/5-6-3.4)7    Sec. 5-6-3.4. Second Chance Probation. 8    (a) Whenever any person who has not previously been 9convicted of any felony offense under the laws of this State, 10the laws of any other state, or the laws of the United States, 11and pleads guilty to, or is found guilty of, possession of less 12than 15 grams of a controlled substance; possession of less 13than 15 grams of methamphetamine; or a probationable felony 14offense of possession of cannabis, theft, retail theft, 15forgery, deceptive practices, possession of a stolen motor 16vehicle, burglary, possession of burglary tools, disorderly 17conduct, criminal damage or trespass to property under Article 1821 of the Criminal Code of 2012, criminal trespass to a 19residence, an offense involving fraudulent identification, or 20obstructing justice; or possession of cannabis, the court, 21with the consent of the defendant and the State's Attorney, 22may, without entering a judgment, sentence the defendant to 23probation under this Section. A sentence under this Section   HB4422- 2 -LRB104 17131 RLC 30957 b1shall not be considered a conviction under Illinois law unless 2and until judgment is entered under subsection (e) of this 3Section. 4    (a-1) Exemptions. A defendant is not eligible for this 5probation if the offense he or she pleads guilty to, or is 6found guilty of, is a violent offense, or he or she has 7previously been convicted of a violent offense. For purposes 8of this probation, a "violent offense" is any offense where 9bodily harm was inflicted or where force was used against any 10person or threatened against any person, any offense involving 11sexual conduct, sexual penetration, or sexual exploitation, 12any offense of domestic violence, domestic battery, violation 13of an order of protection, stalking, hate crime, and any 14offense involving the possession of a firearm or dangerous 15weapon. A defendant shall not be eligible for this probation 16if he or she has previously been adjudicated a delinquent 17minor for the commission of a violent offense as defined in 18this subsection.19    (b) When a defendant is placed on probation, the court 20shall enter an order specifying a period of probation of up to 21not less than 24 months and shall defer further proceedings in 22the case until the conclusion of the period or until the filing 23of a petition alleging violation of a term or condition of 24probation.25    (c) The conditions of probation shall be that the 26defendant:  HB4422- 3 -LRB104 17131 RLC 30957 b1        (1) not violate any criminal statute of this State or 2    any other jurisdiction; and 3        (2) refrain from possessing a firearm or other 4    dangerous weapon. ;5        (3) Blank. make full restitution to the victim or 6    property owner under Section 5-5-6 of this Code;7        (4) Blank. obtain or attempt to obtain employment;8        (5) Blank. pay fines and costs;9        (6) Blank. attend educational courses designed to 10    prepare the defendant for obtaining a high school diploma 11    or to work toward passing high school equivalency testing 12    or to work toward completing a vocational training 13    program;14        (7) Blank. submit to periodic drug testing at a time 15    and in a manner as ordered by the court, but no less than 3 16    times during the period of probation, with the cost of the 17    testing to be paid by the defendant; and18        (8) Blank. perform a minimum of 30 hours of community 19    service. The court may give credit toward the fulfillment 20    of community service hours for participation in activities 21    and treatment as determined by court services. 22    (d) The court may, in addition to other conditions, 23require that the defendant:24        (1) make a report to and appear in person before or 25    participate with the court or such courts, person, or 26    social service agency as directed by the court in the   HB4422- 4 -LRB104 17131 RLC 30957 b1    order of probation;2        (2) undergo medical or psychiatric treatment, or 3    treatment or rehabilitation approved by the Illinois 4    Department of Human Services;5        (3) attend or reside in a facility established for the 6    instruction or residence of defendants on probation;7        (4) support his or her dependents; or8        (5) refrain from having in his or her body the 9    presence of any illicit drug prohibited by the 10    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act, the 11    Cannabis Control Act, or the Illinois Controlled 12    Substances Act, unless prescribed by a physician, and 13    submit samples of his or her blood or urine or both for 14    tests to determine the presence of any illicit drug; 15        (6) make full restitution to the victim or property 16    owner under Section 5-5-6 of this Code;17        (7) obtain or attempt to obtain employment;18        (8) pay fines and costs;19        (9) attend educational courses designed to prepare the 20    defendant for obtaining a high school diploma or to work 21    toward passing high school equivalency testing or to work 22    toward completing a vocational training program; or23        (10) perform community service. The court may give 24    credit toward the fulfillment of community service hours 25    for participation in activities and treatment as 26    determined by court services.  HB4422- 5 -LRB104 17131 RLC 30957 b1    (e) Upon violation of a term or condition of probation, 2the court may enter a judgment on its original finding of guilt 3and proceed as otherwise provided by law.4    (f) Upon fulfillment of the terms and conditions of 5probation, the court shall discharge the person and dismiss 6the proceedings against the person.7    (g) A disposition of probation is considered to be a 8conviction for the purposes of imposing the conditions of 9probation and for appeal; however, a sentence under this 10Section is not a conviction for purposes of this Code or for 11purposes of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by law 12upon conviction of a crime unless and until judgment is 13entered.14    (h) A person may only have one discharge and dismissal 15under this Section within a 4-year period.16    (i) If a person is convicted of any offense which occurred 17within 5 years subsequent to a discharge and dismissal under 18this Section, the discharge and dismissal under this Section 19shall be admissible in the sentencing proceeding for that 20conviction as evidence in aggravation.21    (j) Notwithstanding subsection (a), if the court finds 22that the defendant suffers from a substance abuse problem, 23then before the person is placed on probation under this 24Section, the court may refer the person to the drug court 25established in that judicial circuit pursuant to Section 15 of 26the Drug Court Treatment Act. The drug court team shall   HB4422- 6 -LRB104 17131 RLC 30957 b1evaluate the person's likelihood of successfully fulfilling 2the terms and conditions of probation under this Section and 3shall report the results of its evaluation to the court. If the 4drug court team finds that the person suffers from a substance 5abuse problem that makes him or her substantially unlikely to 6successfully fulfill the terms and conditions of probation 7under this Section, then the drug court shall set forth its 8findings in the form of a written order, and the person shall 9be ineligible to be placed on probation under this Section, 10but shall be considered for the drug court program.11(Source: P.A. 103-702, eff. 1-1-25.) 12    (730 ILCS 5/5-6-3.6)13    Sec. 5-6-3.6. First Time Weapon Offense Program.14    (a) The General Assembly has sought to promote public 15safety, reduce recidivism, and conserve valuable resources of 16the criminal justice system through the creation of diversion 17programs for non-violent offenders. Public Act 103-370 18establishes a program for first-time, non-violent offenders 19charged with certain weapons possession offenses. The General 20Assembly recognizes some persons, particularly in areas of 21high crime or poverty, may have experienced trauma that 22contributes to poor decision making skills, and the creation 23of a diversionary program poses a greater benefit to the 24community and the person than incarceration. Under this 25program, a court, with the consent of the defendant and the   HB4422- 7 -LRB104 17131 RLC 30957 b1State's Attorney, may sentence a defendant charged with an 2unlawful possession of weapons offense under Section 24-1 of 3the Criminal Code of 2012 or aggravated unlawful possession of 4a weapon offense under Section 24-1.6 of the Criminal Code of 52012, if punishable as a Class 4 felony or lower, to a First 6Time Weapon Offense Program.7    (b) A defendant is not eligible for this Program if:8        (1) the offense was committed during the commission of 9    a violent offense as defined in subsection (h) of this 10    Section;11        (2) he or she has previously been convicted or placed 12    on probation or conditional discharge for any violent 13    offense under the laws of this State, the laws of any other 14    state, or the laws of the United States;15        (3) he or she had a prior successful completion of the 16    First Time Weapon Offense Program under this Section;17        (4) he or she has previously been adjudicated a 18    delinquent minor for the commission of a violent offense;19        (5) (blank); or20        (6) he or she has an existing order of protection 21    issued against him or her.22    (b-5) In considering whether a defendant shall be 23sentenced to the First Time Weapon Offense Program, the court 24shall consider the following:25        (1) the age, immaturity, or limited mental capacity of 26    the defendant;  HB4422- 8 -LRB104 17131 RLC 30957 b1        (2) the nature and circumstances of the offense;2        (3) whether participation in the Program is in the 3    interest of the defendant's rehabilitation, including any 4    employment or involvement in community, educational, 5    training, or vocational programs;6        (4) whether the defendant suffers from trauma, as 7    supported by documentation or evaluation by a licensed 8    professional; and9        (5) the potential risk to public safety. 10    (c) For an offense committed on or after January 1, 2018 11(the effective date of Public Act 100-3) whenever an eligible 12person pleads guilty to an unlawful possession of weapons 13offense under Section 24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 or 14aggravated unlawful possession of a weapon offense under 15Section 24-1.6 of the Criminal Code of 2012, which is 16punishable as a Class 4 felony or lower, the court, with the 17consent of the defendant and the State's Attorney, may, 18without entering a judgment, sentence the defendant to 19complete the First Time Weapon Offense Program. When a 20defendant is placed in the Program, the court shall defer 21further proceedings in the case until the conclusion of the 22period or until the filing of a petition alleging violation of 23a term or condition of the Program. A disposition of probation 24is considered to be a conviction for the purposes of imposing 25the conditions of probation and for appeal; however, a 26sentence under this Section is not a conviction for purposes   HB4422- 9 -LRB104 17131 RLC 30957 b1of this Act or for purposes of disqualifications or 2disabilities imposed by law upon conviction of a crime unless 3and until judgment is entered. Upon violation of a term or 4condition of the Program, the court may enter a judgment on its 5original finding of guilt and proceed as otherwise provided by 6law. Upon fulfillment of the terms and conditions of the 7Program, the court shall discharge the person and dismiss the 8proceedings against the person.9    (d) The Program shall be at least 6 months and not to 10exceed 24 months, as determined by the court at the 11recommendation of the Program administrator and with input 12from the State's Attorney and defense counsel. The Program 13administrator may be appointed by the Chief Judge of each 14Judicial Circuit. 15    (e) The conditions of the Program shall be that the 16defendant:17        (1) not violate any criminal statute of this State or 18    any other jurisdiction;19        (2) refrain from possessing a firearm or other 20    dangerous weapon;21        (3) (blank);22        (4) (blank);23        (5) (blank);24        (6) (blank);25        (7) attend and participate in any Program activities 26    deemed required by the Program administrator, such as:   HB4422- 10 -LRB104 17131 RLC 30957 b1    counseling sessions, in-person and over the phone 2    check-ins, and educational classes; and3        (8) (blank).4    (f) The Program may, in addition to other conditions, 5require that the defendant:6        (1) obtain or attempt to obtain employment;7        (2) attend educational courses designed to prepare the 8    defendant for obtaining a high school diploma or to work 9    toward passing high school equivalency testing or to work 10    toward completing a vocational training program;11        (3) refrain from having in his or her body the 12    presence of any illicit drug prohibited by the 13    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act or 14    the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, unless prescribed 15    by a physician, and submit samples of his or her blood or 16    urine or both for tests to determine the presence of any 17    illicit drug; 18        (4) perform community service;19        (5) pay all fines, assessments, fees, and costs; and20        (6) comply with such other reasonable conditions as 21    the court may impose. 22    (f-1) Upon the successful completion of the Program, a 23defendant may submit an application for a Firearm Owner's 24Identification Card upon receiving a court order demonstrating 25completion of the Program. The Illinois State Police shall 26issue a Firearm Owner's Identification Card to such person   HB4422- 11 -LRB104 17131 RLC 30957 b1upon receiving a court order demonstrating completion of the 2Program if the person is otherwise eligible to receive a 3Firearm Owner's Identification Card. Nothing in this Section 4shall prohibit the Illinois State Police from denying an 5application for or revoking a Firearm Owner's Identification 6Card as provided by law. 7    (g) There may be only one discharge and dismissal under 8this Section. If a person is convicted of any offense which 9occurred within 5 years subsequent to a discharge and 10dismissal under this Section, the discharge and dismissal 11under this Section shall be admissible in the sentencing 12proceeding for that conviction as evidence in aggravation.13    (h) For purposes of this Section, "violent offense" means 14any offense in which bodily harm was inflicted or force was 15used against any person or threatened against any person; any 16offense involving the possession of a firearm or dangerous 17weapon; any offense involving sexual conduct, sexual 18penetration, or sexual exploitation; violation of an order of 19protection, stalking, hate crime, domestic battery, or any 20offense of domestic violence.21    (i) (Blank). 22(Source: P.A. 103-370, eff. 7-28-23; 103-702, eff. 1-1-25; 23103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 104-398, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 248-15-25.)